Maryland, session 2025, HB0591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
13 That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
14 Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
15 5–106.
16 (JJ) A PROSECUTION OR SUIT FOR ENFORCEMENT OF A LOCAL CONSUMER
17 PROTECTION CODE FOR WHICH EQUITABLE RELIEF, A FINE, OR A PENALTY IS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0591*

2 HOUSE BILL 591
1 PROVIDED SHALL BE INSTITUTED WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER LOCAL AUTHORITIES
2 KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN OF THE VIOLATION.
3 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
4 October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.